Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1313
Review of dispositional order; when; procedure.

When a child is in foster care placement, the court having jurisdiction over such child for the purposes of foster care placement shall review the dispositional order for such child at least once every six months. The court may reaffirm the order or direct other disposition of the child. Any review hearing by a court having jurisdiction over such child for purposes of foster care placement shall be conducted on the record as provided in sections 43-283 and 43-284, and any recommendations of the office or designated local board concerning such child shall be admissible in such proceedings if such recommendations have been provided to all other parties of record. The court shall review a case on the record more often than every six months and at any time following the original placement of the child if the office or local board requests a hearing in writing specifying the reasons for the review. Members of the office or local board or its designated representative may attend and be heard at any hearing conducted under this section and may participate through counsel at the hearing with the right to call and cross-examine witnesses and present arguments to the court.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 13;

Laws 1990, LB 1222, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB265, § 13.